Colorado, session 2026A, HB1069.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-1-119, add (19) as
follows:
24-1-119. Department of public health and environment -
creation.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(19) THE STATE EMERGENCY MEDICAL AND TRAUMA SERVICES
ADVISORY COUNCIL, CREATED IN SECTION 25-3.5-104 (1), IS A TYPE 2
ENTITY, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-1-105.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-3.5-103, amend
(8.5), (8.6), (8.7), (8.8), and (9); and add (9.8) as follows:
25-3.5-103. Definitions.
As used in this article 3.5, unless the context otherwise requires:
(8.5) "Health information organization network" means an
organization that oversees and governs the exchange of health-related
information among organizations according to nationally recognized
standards. "FIRST RESPONDER" MEANS:
(a) A PEACE OFFICER, AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 16-2.5-101;
(b) A FIREFIGHTER, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 29-5-203 (10);
(c) A VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTER, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 31-30-1102
(9)(a);
(d) AN EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICE PROVIDER; AND
(e) A MENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONAL WHO RESPONDS IN A
PROFESSIONAL CAPACITY TO A JUSTIFIABLE MEDICAL EMERGENCY.
(8.6) "Justifiable medical emergency" means an underlying medical,
traumatic, or psychiatric condition posing an immediate safety risk to the
individual, emergency medical service provider, or public. Excited delirium,
any subsequent term for excited delirium, or any acute psychiatric diagnosis
not recognized in the most recent edition of the diagnostic and statistical
manual of mental disorders is not a justifiable medical emergency "HEALTH
INFORMATION ORGANIZATION NETWORK" MEANS AN ORGANIZATION THAT
OVERSEES AND GOVERNS THE EXCHANGE OF HEALTH-RELATED INFORMATION
AMONG ORGANIZATIONS ACCORDING TO NATIONALLY RECOGNIZED
STANDARDS.
(8.7) "Local licensing authority" means the governing body of a city
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1069

and county or the board of county commissioners in a county in the state
"JUSTIFIABLE MEDICAL EMERGENCY" MEANS AN UNDERLYING MEDICAL,
TRAUMATIC, OR PSYCHIATRIC CONDITION POSING AN IMMEDIATE SAFETY
RISK TO THE INDIVIDUAL, EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICE PROVIDER, OR
PUBLIC. EXCITED DELIRIUM, ANY SUBSEQUENT TERM FOR EXCITED DELIRIUM,
OR ANY ACUTE PSYCHIATRIC DIAGNOSIS NOT RECOGNIZED IN THE MOST
RECENT EDITION OF THE DIAGNOSTIC AND STATISTICAL MANUAL OF
MENTAL DISORDERS IS NOT A JUSTIFIABLE MEDICAL EMERGENCY.
(8.8) "Medical direction" includes, but is not limited to, the
following: "LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY" MEANS THE GOVERNING BODY
OF A CITY AND COUNTY OR THE BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS IN A
COUNTY IN THE STATE.
(a) Approval of the medical components of treatment protocols and
appropriate prearrival instructions;
(b) Routine review of program performance and maintenance of
active involvement in quality improvement activities, including access to
dispatch tapes as necessary for the evaluation of procedures;
(c) Authority to recommend appropriate changes to protocols for the
improvement of patient care; and
(d) Provision of oversight for the ongoing education, training, and
quality assurance for providers of emergency care.
(9) "Patient" means any individual who is sick, injured, or otherwise
incapacitated or helpless. "MEDICAL DIRECTION" INCLUDES, BUT IS NOT
LIMITED TO, THE FOLLOWING:
(a) APPROVAL OF THE MEDICAL COMPONENTS OF TREATMENT
PROTOCOLS AND APPROPRIATE PREARRIVAL INSTRUCTIONS;
(b) ROUTINE REVIEW OF PROGRAM PERFORMANCE AND
MAINTENANCE OF ACTIVE INVOLVEMENT IN QUALITY IMPROVEMENT
ACTIVITIES, INCLUDING ACCESS TO DISPATCH TAPES AS NECESSARY FOR THE
EVALUATION OF PROCEDURES;
(c) AUTHORITY TO RECOMMEND APPROPRIATE CHANGES TO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1069

PROTOCOLS FOR THE IMPROVEMENT OF PATIENT CARE; AND
(d) PROVISION OF OVERSIGHT FOR THE ONGOING EDUCATION,
TRAINING, AND QUALITY ASSURANCE FOR PROVIDERS OF EMERGENCY CARE.
(9.8) "PATIENT" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS SICK, INJURED, OR
OTHERWISE INCAPACITATED OR HELPLESS.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-3.5-104, amend
(4)(d) as follows:
25-3.5-104. Emergency medical and trauma services advisory
council - creation - duties.
(4) The council shall:
(d) Review and approve MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO APPROVE OR
DENY new rules CONCERNING EMERGENCY MEDICAL AND TRAUMA SERVICES
and modifications to rules CONCERNING EMERGENCY MEDICAL AND TRAUMA
SERVICES existing prior to July 1, 2000, prior to the adoption of such rules
or modifications by the state board of health;
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25.5-4-436 as
follows:
25.5-4-436. Transportation by ambulance or other vehicle -
treatment on scene of a medical emergency - evaluation by telemedicine
- definitions.
(1) ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL
REIMBURSE:
(a) AN AMBULANCE SERVICE FOR GROUND TRANSPORTATION BY AN
AMBULANCE OR OTHER APPROPRIATELY SITUATED VEHICLE TO A HOSPITAL
OR OTHER DESTINATION AS DEEMED APPROPRIATE BY THE AMBULANCE
SERVICE'S MEDICAL DIRECTOR;
(b) AN AMBULANCE SERVICE FOR TREATMENT ON THE SCENE OF A
MEDICAL EMERGENCY, WHICH TREATMENT DOES NOT RESULT IN GROUND
TRANSPORTATION; AND
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1069

(c) A QUALIFIED PROVIDER, AN AMBULANCE SERVICE, OR AN AGENCY
PROVIDING OUT-OF-HOSPITAL SERVICES FOR EVALUATION BY TELEMEDICINE
OF A PERSON BEING TREATED BY AN AMBULANCE SERVICE OR AN AGENCY
PROVIDING OUT-OF-HOSPITAL SERVICES FOR THE PURPOSE OF PREVENTING
THE NEED TO TRANSPORT THE PERSON TO A HOSPITAL. TELEMEDICINE SHALL
BE BILLED USING AN OFFICE OR OTHER OUTPATIENT SERVICES RATE AND NOT
USING AN EMERGENCY DEPARTMENT RATE. AN AMBULANCE SERVICE OR AN
AGENCY PROVIDING OUT-OF-HOSPITAL SERVICES IS NOT REQUIRED TO
PROCURE TELEMEDICINE FOR A COVERED PERSON AS A CONDITION OF
PAYMENT.
(2) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "AMBULANCE SERVICE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
25-3.5-103 (3).
(b) (I) "OUT-OF-HOSPITAL SERVICES" MEANS FURNISHING ANY
NECESSARY GOODS AND SERVICES OUTSIDE OF A HOSPITAL SETTING FOR THE
PURPOSE OF PREVENTING, ALLEVIATING, CURING, OR HEALING HUMAN
ILLNESS, A PHYSICAL DISABILITY, A PHYSICAL INJURY, OR A SUBSTANCE USE
DISORDER WHILE RESPONDING TO AN EMERGENCY OR OTHER HEALTH-CARE
CONDITION.
(II) "OUT-OF-HOSPITAL SERVICES" DOES NOT INCLUDE PREHOSPITAL
SETTING TRANSPORTS.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-280-404, amend
(7)(b) as follows:
12-280-404. Program operation - access - rules - definitions.
(7) (b) The board may, within existing funds available for operation
of the program, provide a means of sharing prescription information and
electronic health records through a board-approved vendor and method with
the health information organization network, as defined in section
25-3.5-103 (8.5) SECTION 25-3.5-103 (8.6), in order to work collaboratively
with the statewide health information exchanges designated by the
department of health care policy and financing. Use of the information
made available pursuant to this subsection (7)(b) is subject to privacy and
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1069

security protections in state law and the federal "Health Insurance
Portability and Accountability Act of 1996", Pub.L.104-191, as amended,
and any implementing regulations.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-54-101, amend (4)
as follows:
25-54-101. Definitions.
As used in this article 54, unless the context otherwise requires:
(4) "Health information organization network" means a Colorado
organization that has experience in overseeing and governing the exchange
of health-related information among organizations according to Colorado
law and nationally recognized standards including but not limited to the
federal "Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996",
Pub.L. 104-191, as amended HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
25-3.5-103 (8.6).
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 27-50-101, amend (14)
as follows:
27-50-101. Definitions.
As used in this article 50, unless the context otherwise requires:
(14) "Health information organization network" has the same
meaning as defined in section 25-3.5-103 (8.5) SECTION 25-3.5-103 (8.6).
SECTION 8. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1069

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1069